Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Chapter 31. Public Improvement Districts

§ 19-31-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Public Improvement District Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 1, 2002.).

§ 19-31-3.
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

There is a need for uniform, focused and fair procedures in state law to provide a reasonable alternative for the establishment, power, operation and duration of independent districts to manage and finance basic public improvement services; and that, based upon a proper and fair determination of applicable facts, an independent district can constitute a timely, efficient, effective, responsive and economic way to deliver these basic services, thereby providing a solution to the state’s planning, management and financing needs for delivery of capital infrastructure in order to service projected growth without overburdening counties and municipalities and their taxpayers.

It is the legislative intent and purpose to authorize a uniform procedure by general law to establish an independent special district as an alternative method to manage and finance basic services for public improvements through the levy and collection of special assessments. It is further the legislative intent and purpose to provide by general law for the uniform operation, exercise of power and procedure for termination of any such independent district. It is further the purpose and intent of the Legislature that a district created under this chapter not have or exercise any zoning or permitting power. It is further the purpose and intent of the Legislature that no debt or obligation of a district shall constitute a burden on any local government without its consent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 1, 2002.).

§ 19-31-5.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Assessable improvements” means any public improvements and community facilities that the district is empowered to provide in accordance with this chapter.

“Assessment bonds” means special obligations of the district that are payable solely from proceeds of the special assessments levied for an assessable project.

“Board” or “board of directors” means the governing board of the district or, if such board has been abolished, the board, body or commission succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to whom the powers given to the board by this chapter have been given by law.

“Bond” includes certificate, and the provisions that are applicable to bonds are equally applicable to certificates. The term “bond” includes any assessment bond, refunding bond, revenue bond and other such obligation in the nature of a bond as is provided for in this chapter.

“Public improvement district” or “district” means a special district that is created pursuant to this chapter and limited to the performance of those specialized functions authorized by this chapter, the boundaries of which are contained wholly within a single county or two (2) or more contiguous counties; the governing head of which is a body created, organized and constituted and authorized to function specifically as prescribed in this chapter for the delivery of public improvement services; and the formation powers, governing body, operation, duration accountability, requirements for disclosure and termination of which are as required by general law.

“Contribution agreement” means an agreement between a district and a public entity under which the public entity agrees to provide financial or credit support in the form of cash, pledge, guaranty or other enhancement, which agreement must be approved in accordance with Sections 17-13-1 through 17-13-17.

“Cost,” when used with reference to any project, includes, but is not limited to:

The expenses of determining the feasibility or practicability of acquisition, construction or reconstruction.

The cost of surveys, estimates, plans and specifications.

The cost of improvements.

Engineering, fiscal and legal expenses and charges.

The cost of all labor, materials, machinery and equipment.

The cost of all lands, rights, servitudes and franchises acquired.

Financing charges.

The creation of initial reserve and debt service funds.

Working capital.

Interest charges incurred or estimated to be incurred on money borrowed before and during construction and acquisition and for such reasonable period of time after completion of construction or acquisition as the board may determine.

The cost of issuance of bonds pursuant to this chapter, including advertisements and printing.

The cost of any election held pursuant to this chapter and all other expenses of issuance of bonds.

The discount, if any, on the sale or exchange of bonds.

Administrative expenses.

Such other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the acquisition, construction or reconstruction of any project or to the financing thereof, or to the development of any lands within the district.

“District manager” means the manager of the district.

“District roads” means highways, streets, roads, alleys, sidewalks, landscaping, storm drains, bridges and thoroughfares of all kinds and descriptions.

“Landowner” means the owner of land, including real property as it appears in the official records of the county, including a trustee, a private corporation or other entity, and an owner of a condominium unit.

“Market value” means the amount in cash, or on terms reasonably equivalent to cash, for which in all probability the property would have sold on the effective date of the appraisal, after a reasonable exposure time on the open competitive market, from a willing and reasonably knowledgeable seller to a willing and reasonably knowledgeable buyer, with neither acting under any compulsion to buy or sell, giving due consideration to all available economic uses of the property at the time of the appraisal. Market value must be determined in accordance with Section 27-35-50 and must conform to the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisers Practice.

“Project” means any development, improvement, property, utility, facility, works, enterprise or service undertaken after April 1, 2002, or established under the provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the following:

Water management and control for the lands within the district and connection of some or any of such facilities with roads and bridges;

Water supply, sewer and wastewater management, reclamation and reuse, or any combination thereof;

Bridges or culverts that may be needed across any drain, ditch, canal, floodway, holding basin, excavation, public highway, tract, grade, fill or cut and roadways over levees and embankments;

District roads equal to or exceeding the specifications of the county in which the district roads are located, including street lights and the location of underground utilities;

Parks and facilities for indoor and outdoor recreational, cultural and educational uses, and other tourism related infrastructure and facilities;

Fire prevention and control, including fire stations, water mains and plugs, fire trucks, and other vehicles and equipment;

Security, except that the district may not exercise any police power but may contract with the appropriate local governmental agencies for an increased level of such services within the district boundaries;

Waste collection and disposal;

Acquisition, construction, repair, renovation, demolition or removal of:

1. Buildings and site improvements (including fixtures);

2. Potable and nonpotable water supply systems;

3. Sewage and waste disposal systems;

4. Storm water drainage and other drainage systems;

5. Airport facilities;

6. Rail lines and rail spurs;

7. Port facilities;

8. Highways, streets and other roadways;

9. Fire suppression and prevention systems;

10. Utility distribution systems, including, but not limited to, water, electricity, natural gas, telephone and other information and telecommunications facilities, whether by wire, fiber or wireless means; however, electrical, natural gas, telephone and telecommunication systems may be constructed, repaired or renovated only for the purpose of completing the project and connecting to existing utility systems. This provision may not be construed to prevent a city, county or natural gas district from supplying utility service that it is authorized to supply in the service area that it is authorized to serve; and

11. Business, industrial and technology parks and the acquisition of land and acquisition or construction of improvements to land connected with any of the preceding purposes;

County purposes authorized by or defined in Sections 17-5-3 and 19-9-1, except Section 19-9-1(f); and

Municipal purposes authorized by or defined in Sections 17-5-3, 17-17-301 through 17-17-349, 21-27-23 and 21-33-301.

“Public entity” means any governmental agency, county or municipality, which enters into a contribution agreement with a district in accordance with this chapter.

“Qualified voter” means any landowner within the district who is at least eighteen (18) years of age, or the landowner’s authorized representative who is at least eighteen (18) years of age. If the landowner of a parcel consists of more than one (1) person or is a corporation, partnership, limited liability company or any association or legal entity organized to conduct business, the majority interest of the landowners of the parcel shall select one (1) person who is at least eighteen (18) years of age to serve as the “qualified voter” for the group.

“Revenue bonds” means obligations of the district that are payable from revenues derived from sources other than ad valorem taxes on real or personal property and that do not pledge the property, credit or general tax revenue of the district.

“Sewer system” means any plant, system, facility or property, and additions, extensions and improvements thereto, useful or necessary in connection with the collection, treatment or disposal of sewage.

“Water management and control facilities” means any lakes, canals, ditches, reservoirs, dams, levees, floodways, pumping stations or any other works, structures or facilities for the conservation, control, development, utilization and disposal of water, and any purposes incidental thereto.

“Water system” means any plant system, facility or property, and additions, extensions, and improvements thereto, useful or necessary in connection with the development of sources, treatment or purification and distribution of water.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 3; Laws, 2007, ch. 405, § 1, eff July 2, 2007; Laws, 2012, ch. 468, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 19-31-7.
Establishment of public improvement districts; by local ordinance granting petition; public hearing; contents of ordinance; contribution agreements.

The method for the establishment of a public improvement district shall be pursuant to an ordinance adopted by the governing body of each county in which the land is located granting a petition for the establishment of a public improvement district. The petition for the establishment of a public improvement district shall be filed by the petitioner with the governing body of the county or counties. The petition shall contain:

A description of the boundaries of the district;

The written consent to the establishment of the district by all landowners in the district;

A designation of five (5) persons to be the initial members of the board of directors, who shall serve in that office until replaced by elected members as provided in Section 19-31-9;

The proposed name of the district;

A map of the proposed district showing existing infrastructure, if any; and

Based upon available data, the proposed timetable for construction of the district services and the estimated cost of constructing the proposed services.

A public hearing on the petition shall be conducted by the governing body of each county of the proposed district within sixty (60) days after the petition is filed unless an extension of time is requested by the petitioners and granted by the governing body of each county. The hearing shall be held at an accessible location in each county in which the public improvement district is to be located. The petitioner shall cause a notice of the hearing to be published in a newspaper having general circulation in each county at least once a week for the four (4) successive weeks immediately prior to the hearing. Such notice shall give the time and place for the hearing, a description of the area to be included in the district, and any other relevant information which the establishing governing bodies may require. The advertisement shall be published in the official minutes of the local governing body.

The governing body of each county shall consider the record of the public hearing and any other relevant factors in making its determination to grant or deny a petition for the establishment of a public improvement district.

An ordinance establishing a public improvement district shall include the boundaries of the district, the names of the five (5) persons designated to be the initial members of the board of directors of the district and the name of the district.

If all of the land in the area for the proposed district is within the territorial jurisdiction of a municipality, then the petition requesting establishment of a public improvement district under this chapter shall be filed by the petitioner with that particular municipality. In such event, the duties of the county with regard to the petition shall be the duties of the municipality. If any of the land area of a proposed district is within the land area of a municipality, the governing body of the county may not create the district without the approval of the municipality.

The governing body of any governmental agency, county and/or municipality may enter into contribution agreements with the district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 4; Laws, 2007, ch. 405, § 2, eff July 2, 2007; Laws, 2012, ch. 468, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 19-31-9.
Board of directors; membership, terms, election, voting by proxy; oath of office; filling of vacancy; quorum; officers; minutes; compensation.

The board of the district shall exercise the powers granted to the district pursuant to this chapter. The board shall consist of five (5) members as otherwise provided in this section. Each member shall hold office for an initial term of six (6) years and until a successor is chosen and qualifies. The initial members of the board shall be residents of the state, and at least one (1) of the initial members shall be either a qualified voter within the district or an individual resident of the area immediately adjacent to the district. Upon appointment or election, the board members shall elect a chair who shall conduct board meetings.

Beginning six (6) years after the initial appointment of members, the position of each member whose term has expired shall be filled by a qualified voter of the district, elected by the qualified voters of the district. There shall be an election of members every six (6) years from the date of the ordinance establishing the district. The district manager shall determine the date and time of the election, which election must be held at least twenty (20) days before the anniversary date of the ordinance establishing the district. If a contribution agreement exists, then the governing body of the public entity that is a party to the contribution agreement may appoint one (1) of the five (5) members to the board of the district at the time of the election in lieu of electing that member.

Candidates must qualify in writing by submitting a “Statement of Intent,” as prescribed in this paragraph, to the district manager thirty (30) days before the election. The district manager shall prepare a ballot of all candidates qualified to run for office twenty-eight (28) days before the election.

Statement of Intent

(Title) (Date)

Candidate for (insert name of district) Public Improvement District

I, (name of candidate as it will appear on the ballot),

(mailing address, street address, city, state, zip code, telephone number of the candidate), certify that I am a qualified voter, as defined in Section 19-31-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, of the (insert name of public improvement district) Public Improvement District in the State of Mississippi; and I do hereby declare my candidacy for Board of the (insert name of public improvement district) Public Improvement District at the election to be held on (insert date of election).

_______________

(Signature of candidate) (Date)

Received by_______________

Notice of the election shall be announced at a public meeting of the board at least ninety (90) days before the date of the election and shall be published once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper which is in general circulation in the area of the district, the last day of such publication to be not fewer than fourteen (14) days nor more than twenty-eight (28) days before the election. In addition, notice of the election shall be sent by United States first-class mail, not fewer than fourteen (14) days before the election, to all qualified voters at their last known address as shown on the tax rolls. Instructions on how all qualified voters may participate in the election, along with sample proxies, shall be provided as part of the notice required by this paragraph, and the location, date and time of the election shall be included on all instructions and notices.

Each qualified voter shall be entitled to cast only one (1) ballot to elect each of the board members, regardless of the number of parcels owned by that voter within the district. Parcels may not be aggregated for determining the number of ballots allowed to be cast by a qualified voter. A list of qualified voters in the form of a voter roll must be kept current by the district manager and deemed final thirty (30) days before the election.

A qualified voter may vote in person or by proxy in writing. A vote cast by proxy must be submitted at or within fourteen (14) days before the election and must be submitted in the form prescribed in this section. Each proxy must be signed by the qualified voter for which the vote is cast and must contain the typed or printed name of the individual who signed the proxy and the street address, legal description of the property or the property’s tax parcel identification number. The signature on a proxy need not be notarized. All votes cast by proxy must be reflected in the voter roll.

Proxy for Election

1. Do constitute and appoint_______________(name), attorney and agent for me, and in my name, place and stead, to vote as my proxy for the election of members of the Board of Directors of the (name of district) Public Improvement District on (insert date), at the (insert voting location/facility name with street address); OR (only choose one)

2. Do hereby cast my vote for:_______________[print or type name of person being voted for – PLEASE NOTE THAT YOUR VOTE MUST BE FOR A QUALIFIED VOTER (AS DEFINED IN MISSISSIPPI CODE SECTION 19-31-5) OF THE DISTRICT. A QUALIFIED VOTER MEANS ANY LANDOWNER OF THE DISTRICT WHO IS AT LEAST EIGHTEEN (18) YEARS OF AGE OR AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE LANDOWNER WHO IS ALSO AT LEAST EIGHTEEN (18) YEARS OF AGE.] to be elected as a member of the Board of Directors of the (name of district) Public Improvement District for a term beginning (date of term) and ending six (6) years from that date or until a successor is chosen.

(Insert name of district) Public Improvement District

I,_______________ , (name of qualified voter);_______________(street address);_______________(legal description);_______________(tax parcel identification number).

[NOTE: To be considered, this proxy must contain at least one (1) of either: the street address; legal description; or tax parcel identification number.]

I understand that I have the right to revoke this proxy at any time before the election. I understand that I have the right to be present in person at the election.

I have executed this proxy on (insert date).

_______________(Printed Name of Qualified Voter)

_______________(Signature of Qualified Voter)

A qualified voter may cast only one (1) vote for each of the five (5) board member positions. When a qualified voter casts a vote for the same person more than once, only one (1) of the votes cast for that person will be counted. When a qualified voter casts more votes to elect board members than he or she is entitled to cast, all votes are invalid, and the qualified voter is deemed to have voted for none of them. When a qualified voter casts fewer votes to elect board members than he or she is entitled to cast, all votes cast by the qualified voter must be counted, but no votes shall be counted more than once.

If a board member dies, resigns or otherwise is prevented from serving as a board member, the board of the district shall appoint a member to fill the remainder of the board member’s term. If no qualified voter is willing to serve on the board of the district, the governing body that established the district shall appoint members as necessary to fill any vacancy for the remainder of the term.

Members of the board shall be known as directors and, upon entering into office, shall take an oath of office. They shall hold office for the terms for which they were elected or appointed and until their successors are chosen and qualified. If during the term of office, a vacancy occurs, the remaining members of the board shall fill the vacancy by an appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.

A majority of the members of the board constitutes a quorum for the purposes of conducting its business and exercising its powers and for all other purposes. Action taken by the district shall be upon a vote of a majority of the members present unless general law or a rule of the district requires a greater number. If a quorum cannot be obtained in a board meeting, the governing body that established the district shall appoint members as necessary to replace any board member missing three (3) consecutive meetings.

As soon as practicable after each election or appointment, the board shall organize by electing one (1) of its members as chair and by electing a secretary, who need not be a member of the board, and such other officers as the board may deem necessary.

The board shall keep a permanent minute book in which shall be recorded minutes of all meetings, resolutions, ordinances, proceedings and all corporate acts.

Members of the board may receive per diem compensation for services in an amount as provided under Section 25-3-69, and shall be entitled to expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of their duties in accordance with Section 25-3-41. Any payments for compensation and expenses shall be paid from funds of the district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 5; Laws, 2008, ch. 463, § 1, eff July 9, 2008; Laws, 2012, ch. 468, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 19-31-11.
District manager; powers and duties; compensation; treasurer; district funds; audit; depository for district funds.

The board shall employ and fix the compensation of a district manager. The district manager shall have charge and supervision of the works of the district and shall be responsible for (a) preserving and maintaining any improvement or facility constructed or erected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, (b) maintaining and operating the equipment owned by the district, and (c) for performing such other duties as may be prescribed by the board. The district manager may hire or otherwise employ and terminate the employment of such other persons including, without limitation, professional, supervisory and clerical employees, as may be necessary as authorized by the board. The compensation and other conditions of employment of the officers and employees of the district shall be as provided by the board. The district manager, a board member or district employee may be a stockholder, officer or employee of a landowner.

The board shall designate a person who is a resident of the state as treasurer of the district, who shall have charge of the funds of the district. Such funds shall be disbursed only upon the order or pursuant to the resolution of the board by warrant or check countersigned by the treasurer and by such other person as may be authorized by the board. The board may give the treasurer such other or additional powers and duties as the board may deem appropriate and may fix his or her compensation. The board may require the treasurer to give a bond in such amount on such terms, and with such sureties as may be deemed satisfactory to the board to secure the performance by the treasurer of his or her powers and duties. The financial records of the district shall be audited by an independent certified public accountant at least once a year.

The board may select as a depository for its funds any qualified public depository as provided for under Sections 27-105-301 through 27-105-371.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 1, 2002.).

§ 19-31-13.
Compliance with county budget law; submission of proposed annual budget 60 days prior to adoption.

The district shall comply with Sections 19-11-1 through 19-11-27, the County Budget Law.

At least sixty (60) days before adoption of the annual budget, the district board shall submit to the local governing authorities having jurisdiction over the area included in the district for purposes of disclosure and information only, the proposed annual budget for the ensuing fiscal year and any proposed long-term financial plan or program of the district for future operations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 1, 2002.).

§ 19-31-15.
Full disclosure of information relating to public financing and maintenance of improvements.

The district shall take affirmative steps to provide for the full disclosure of information relating to the public financing and maintenance of improvements to real property undertaken by the district. Such information shall be made available to all existing residents and to all prospective residents of the district. The district shall furnish each developer of a residential development within the district with sufficient copies of that information who shall provide each prospective initial purchaser of property in that development with a copy.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 1, 2002.).

§ 19-31-17.
Powers of district.

The district shall have, and the board may exercise, the power:

To sue and be sued in the name of the district.

To adopt and use a seal and authorize the use of a facsimile thereof.

To acquire, by purchase, gift, devise or otherwise, and to dispose of, real and personal property.

To dedicate, donate or convey in any manner, real and personal property under such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon, to:

Nonprofit entities that have been issued a certificate of public convenience and necessity by the Public Service Commission; or

Governmental entities.

To make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers.

To contract for the services of consultants to perform planning, engineering, financial, legal, or other appropriate services of a professional nature.

To borrow money and accept gifts; to apply for and use grants or loans of money or other property from the United States, the state, a unit of local government or any person or any organization for any district purposes and enter into agreements required in connection therewith; and to hold, use and dispose of such monies or property for any district purposes in accordance with the terms of the gift, grant, loan or agreement relating thereto.

To adopt bylaws prescribing the powers, duties and functions of the officers of the district, the conduct of the business of the district and the maintenance of records.

To maintain an office at such place or places as it may designate within a county in which the district is located, which office must be reasonably accessible to the landowners. Meetings shall be held at such office or such other location as may be designated by the board.

To hold, control and acquire by donation, or purchase or dispose of, any public servitudes or dedications to public use and to make use of such servitudes or dedications for any of the purposes authorized by this chapter.

To lease as lessor or lessee to or from any person, firm, corporation, association, or body public or private, any projects of the type that the district is authorized to undertake and facilities or property of any nature for the use of the district to carry out any of the purposes authorized by this chapter.

To borrow money and issue bonds, certificates, warrants, notes or other evidence of indebtedness as provided in this chapter; to levy such special assessments as may be authorized; and to charge, collect and enforce fees and other user charges.

To acquire property within the boundaries of the district for public use through condemnation, exercised pursuant to Sections 11-27-1 through 11-27-51, subject to the approval of the governing body of the county and/or the municipality that enacted the ordinance establishing the district.

To raise, by user charges or fees authorized by resolution of the board, amounts of money which are necessary for the conduct of the district activities and services; to finance projects and to pledge user charges and fees for the payment of any bond or other indebtedness of the district; and to enforce the receipt and collection of user charges and fees in the manner prescribed by resolution not inconsistent with law.

To cooperate, contract, or enter into contribution agreements with other governmental agencies, including the governing bodies of counties and/or municipalities, as may be necessary, convenient, incidental or proper in connection with any of the powers, duties or purposes authorized by this chapter.

To determine, order, levy, impose, collect and enforce special assessments pursuant to this chapter.

To enter into interlocal cooperative agreements pursuant to Sections 17-13-1 through 17-13-17.

To covenant with the holders of assessment bonds or other obligations that it will diligently and faithfully enforce and collect all the special assessments, charges and fees, and interest and penalties thereon.

To exercise all of the powers necessary and proper in connection with any of the powers, duties or purposes authorized by this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 9; Laws, 2003, ch. 488, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 468, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 19-31-19.
Special powers relating to public improvements and community facilities.

The district shall have, and the board may exercise, any or all of the special powers relating to public improvements and community facilities authorized by this chapter. The district shall have the power to finance, fund, establish, acquire, construct or reconstruct, enlarge or extend, equip, operate and maintain systems, facilities, projects and basic infrastructures that are within the district, or which benefit or serve the district, for the following:

Water management and control for the lands within the district and connection of some or any of such facilities with roads and bridges;

Water supply, sewer and wastewater management, reclamation and reuse, or any combination thereof;

Bridges or culverts that may be needed across any drain, ditch, canal, floodway, holding basin, excavation, public highway, tract, grade, fill or cut and roadways over levees and embankments;

District roads equal to or exceeding the specifications of the county in which such district roads are located, including street lights and the location of underground utilities;

Parks and facilities for indoor and outdoor recreational, cultural and educational uses, and other tourism related infrastructure and facilities;

Fire prevention and control, including fire stations, water mains and plugs, fire trucks, and other vehicles and equipment;

Security, except that the district may not exercise any police power, but may contract with the appropriate local governmental agencies for an increased level of such services within the district boundaries;

Waste collection and disposal;

Systems, as defined in Section 21-27-11(b); and

Projects, as defined in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499 , § 10; Laws, 2012, ch. 468, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 19-31-21.
Public hearing and determination of public interest required before district may purchase, sell, dedicate, donate or convey in any manner, or enter into management contract for public wastewater utility.

No public improvement district may purchase, sell, dedicate, donate or convey in any manner a water or wastewater utility that provides service to the public, or enter into a management contract for such facilities, until the board has held a public hearing on the purchase, sale, dedication, donation, conveyance or management contract and has made a determination that the purchase, sale or management contract is in the public interest.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 11; Laws, 2003, ch. 488, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 28, 2003.).